nl: Aubergine variëteit: Black Beauty; Chinees; Bol; Indiaas (baby); Italiaans; Japans; Gestreepte/graffiti; Thais; Wit; Overige
da: Auberginesort: Black Beauty; Kinesisk; Globe; Indisk (baby); Italiensk; Japansk; Stribet/graffiti; Thailandsk; Hvid; Andet
th: สายพันธุ์มะเขือยาว: Black Beauty; จีน; ทรงกลม; อินเดีย (เล็ก); อิตาลี; ญี่ปุ่น; ลายทาง/กราฟฟิตี้; ไทย; สีขาว; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 茄子品种: 黑美人; 中国茄子; 圆茄子; 印度（小茄子）; 意大利茄子; 日本茄子; 条纹/涂鸦茄子; 泰国茄子; 白茄子; 其他
vi: Giống cà tím: Black Beauty; Trung Quốc; Tròn; Ấn Độ (Nhỏ); Ý; Nhật Bản; Sọc/Graffiti; Thái; Màu trắng; Khác
pt-PT: Variedade de beringela: Black Beauty; Chinesa; Globo; Indiana (baby); Italiana; Japonesa; Riscada/Graffiti; Tailandesa; Branca; Outro
ja: ナスの種類: ブラックビューティー; 中国ナス; 米ナス; インドナス (ベビー); イタリアナス; 日本ナス; ストライプ/グラフィティ; タイナス; 白ナス; その他
fr: variété d'aubergines: Black Beauty; Chinoise; Globe; Indienne (mini); Italienne; Japonaise; Rayée/Graffiti; Thaï; Blanche; Autre
pl: Odmiana bakłażana: Black Beauty; Chiński; Globe; Indyjski (Baby); Włoski; Japoński; Pasiasty / Graffiti; Tajski; Biały; Inne
de: Auberginensorte: Black Beauty; Chinesisch; Globe; Indisch (Baby); Italienisch; Japanisch; Gestreift/Graffiti; Thai; Weiß; Sonstige
zh-TW: 茄子品種: 黑美人; 中國圓茄; 球茄; 印度茄 (迷你茄); 義大利茄; 日本茄; 條紋/塗鴉茄; 泰國茄; 白茄; 其他
hu: Padlizsánfajta: Black Beauty; Kínai; Gömb; Indiai (bébi); Olasz; Japán; Csíkos/Graffiti; Thai; Fehér; Egyéb
nb: Auberginevariant: Black Beauty; Kinesisk; Globe; Indisk (baby); Italiensk; Japansk; Stripet/graffiti; Thai; Hvit; Annet
en: Eggplant variety: Black Beauty; Chinese; Globe; Indian (Baby); Italian; Japanese; Striped/Graffiti; Thai; White; Other
fi: Munakoisolajike: Black Beauty; Kiinalainen; Globe; Intialainen (mini); Italialainen; Japanilainen; Raidallinen/Graffiti; Thaimaalainen; Valkoinen; Muu
bg-BG: Сорт патладжан: Black Beauty; Китайски; Кълбовидни; Индийски (бейби); Италиански; Японски; Раирани/Графити; Тайландски; Бели; Друго
sv: Auberginesort: Black Beauty; Kinesisk; Globe; Indisk (baby); Italiensk; Japansk; Randig/graffiti; Thailändsk; Vit; Övrigt
ru: Сорт баклажана: Black Beauty; Китайский; Шаровидный (Globe); Индийский (мини); Итальянский; Японский; Полосатый/Граффити; Тайский; Белый; Другое
tr: Patlıcan çeşidi: Black Beauty; Çin; Küre; Hint (Bebek); İtalyan; Japon; Çizgili/Graffiti; Tay; Beyaz; Diğer
hr-HR: Sorta patlidžana: Black Beauty; Kineski; Globe; Indijski (Baby); Talijanski; Japanski; Prugasti/Graffiti; Tajlandski; Bijeli; Ostalo
ro-RO: Soi de vinete: Black Beauty; Chinezească; Rotundă (Globe); Indiană (Mini); Italiană; Japoneză; Dungată/Graffiti; Thailandeză; Albă; Altele
it: Varietà di melanzane: Black Beauty; Cinese; Tonda; Indiana (Baby); Italiana; Giapponese; Striata/Graffiti; Thailandese; Bianca; Altro
cs: Odrůda lilku: Black Beauty; Čínský; Kulatý; Indický (mini); Italský; Japonský; Pruhovaný (Graffiti); Thajský; Bílý; Jiné
ko: 가지 품종: 블랙 뷰티; 중국; 글로브; 인도(미니); 이탈리아; 일본; 줄무늬/그래피티; 태국; 흰색; 기타
sk-SK: Odroda baklažánu: Black Beauty; Čínsky; Guľatý; Indický (mini); Taliansky; Japonský; Pruhovaný/Graffiti; Thajský; Biely; Iné
es: Variedad de berenjenas: Black Beauty; China; Globo; India (baby); Italiana; Japonesa; Rayada/graffiti; Tailandesa; Blanco; Otro
lt-LT: Baklažanų veislė: Black Beauty; Kiniški; Apvalieji; Indiški (mažieji); Itališki; Japoniški; Dryžuoti / „Graffiti“; Tailandietiški; Balti; Kita
pt-BR: Variedade de berinjela: Black Beauty; Chinesa; Globo; Indiana (Baby); Italiana; Japonesa; Listrada/Graffiti; Tailandesa; Branca; Outro
sl-SI: Sorta jajčevcev: Black Beauty; Kitajski; Kroglasti; Indijski (Baby); Italijanski; Japonski; Progasti/Graffiti; Tajski; Beli; Drugo
el: Ποικιλία μελιτζάνας: Black Beauty; Κινέζικη; Σφαιρική; Ινδική (Baby); Ιταλική; Ιαπωνική; Ριγέ/Graffiti; Ταϊλανδέζικη; Λευκή; Άλλο